Utah statutes.
26-8a-308.   Exemptions.
(1)  The following persons may provide emergency medical services to a patient
without being certified or licensed under this chapter:
(a)  out-of-state emergency medical service personnel and providers in time of
disaster;
(b)  an individual who gratuitously acts as a Good Samaritan;
(c)  a family member;
(d)  a private business if emergency medical services are provided only to
employees at the place of business and during transport;
(e)  an agency of the United States government if compliance with this chapter
would be inconsistent with federal law; and
(f)  police, fire, and other public service personnel if:
(i)  emergency medical services are rendered in the normal course of the
person's duties; and
(ii)  medical control, after being apprised of the circumstances, directs
immediate transport.
(2)  An ambulance or emergency response vehicle may operate without a permit
issued under Section 26-8a-304 in time of disaster.
(3)  Nothing in this chapter or Title 58, Occupations and Professions, may be
construed as requiring a license or certificate for an individual to
administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation or to use a fully automated external
defibrillator under Section 26-8b-201.
(4)  Nothing in this chapter may be construed as requiring a license, permit,
designation, or certificate for an acute care hospital, medical clinic,
physician's office, or other fixed medical facility that:
(a)  is staffed by a physician, physician's assistant, nurse practitioner, or
registered nurse; and
(b)  treats an individual who has presented himself or was transported to the
hospital, clinic, office, or facility.
